Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Mandatory State Supplemental Payments to Aged, Blind and Disabled Persons

§ 43-1-31.
Purpose of law; contracts with, and payment by, federal authority.

The purpose of Sections 43-1-31 through 43-1-37 is to provide that this state shall be eligible for medicaid payments pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act with respect to expenditures for any quarter beginning after December 1973. The state department of public welfare shall negotiate an agreement with the secretary of health, education and welfare which shall provide that this state will provide to aged, blind and disabled individuals residing in this state, who for the month of December 1973 were eligible to receive and were recipients of aid or assistance under this state’s plan approved under Titles I, X and XIV, mandatory state supplementary payments for each month beginning with January 1974, pursuant to Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act, in an amount determined in accordance with section 3(1) in order to maintain income levels equal to that of December 1973.

From and after July 1, 1974, mandatory state supplementary payments herein provided for shall be made by the appropriate federal authority, and the state department of public welfare is hereby directed to enter into contract with such federal authority to provide therefor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 301, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved January 29, 1974).

§ 43-1-33.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 43-1-31 through 43-1-37:

“Aged, blind or disabled individual” shall mean any individual who would be so defined in section 1614(a) of the federal Social Security Act.

“December 1973 income” shall mean an amount equal to the aggregate of:

the amount of the aid or assistance in the form of money payments which such individual would have received, including any part of such amount which is attributable to meeting “special needs” or “special circumstances” as defined in Public Law 93-66, under a plan approved under Title I, X or XIV of the Social Security Act, if the terms and conditions of such plan relating to eligibility for and amount of such aid or assistance payable thereunder were for the month of December 1973 the same as those in effect under such plan for the month of June 1973, and

the amount of the income of such individual other than the aid or assistance described in subparagraph (i) received by such individual in December 1973, minus any such income which did not result, but which if properly reported would have resulted in a reduction in the amount of such aid or assistance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 301, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved January 29, 1974).

§ 43-1-35.
Amount of payments.

The amount of the mandatory state supplementary payment in the case of any eligible individual or couple for any month shall be equal to the amount by which such individual’s or couple’s December 1973 income (as defined in Section 43-1-33) exceeds the amount to which such individual or couple is entitled under Title XVI for such month and the amount of any income of such individual for such month.

If for any month after December 1973 there is a change with respect to any special need or special circumstance as defined in Section 43-1-33(b)(i) which, if such change had existed in December 1973, would have caused a reduction in the amount of such individual’s aid or assistance payment; then, for such month and for each month thereafter, the amount of the mandatory minimum state supplementary payment payable to such individual may be reduced by an amount by which the payment would have been reduced by reason of such change.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 301, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved January 29, 1974).

§ 43-1-37.
When person becomes ineligible to receive payments.

An individual eligible for mandatory state supplementary payments from the state beginning in January 1974 shall not be eligible for such payments:

the next succeeding month after the individual dies, or

the next succeeding month after such individual ceases to be an aged, blind or disabled individual, or

during any entire month in which such individual is not a resident of this state, or

the next succeeding month after such individual’s benefits under Title XVI, together with other income, equal or exceed such individual’s December 1973 income as herein defined.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 301, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved January 29, 1974).